src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
rääʹǩǩes+A+Sg+Nom **beloved/rakas**
* *rä%^1VOW0kkes%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL*
* *rääʹǩǩes0000*
* *jo%^1VOW0kk%^PAL%>e*
* *jo0ʹǩǩ0%>e*
* *saa0kk%^VV2V%^PAL%>e*
* *sa0ʹǩǩ00%>e*
kåålvak+N+Sg+Loc
* *kåålvak%^RmVow%^PALK%>est*
* *kåålv0ǩ00%>est*

tõiŋsǩed+V+Inf
* *tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *tõ0iŋ0sǩ0000>ed*
* ★*tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed* (is not standard language)
* ★*tõ0iŋ0sk0000>ed* (is not standard language)

**Even-syllabic nouns I, Depalatalization of ǩ:k** - used in
* *mätkk%>a*
* *mätkk%>a*
kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Ill:
* *kaađnẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}ǩ{XC}^PALNo^C2CC>a*
* *kaađnẹ00kk00%>a*

prääʹzniǩ+N+Sg+Ill: **celebration/juhla**
* *prääʹzniǩ%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a*
* *prääʹzn0k00%>a*
* *kaaddâšǩ%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a*
* *ka0d00šk000000%>a*

**Even-syllabic nouns, removing palatalization in -est +Loc nouns** - removing palatalization in +Sg+Ill,  pieʹss:peässa
* *čââʹlmtẹ%^1VOWm%{XC%}%^C2CC%>a*
* *čââʹlmtẹ0mm0%>a*
stroitteʹl+N+Sg+Ill: **plant/laitos**
* *stroitteʹl%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a*
* *stroitt00l00%>a*
prääʹzniǩ+N+Sg+Ill: **celebration/juhla**
* *prääʹzniǩ%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a*
* *prääʹzn0k00%>a*

## Consonant QUANTITY CHANGE gradation rules

### Weakening Consonant Cluster

dealing with relative length changes
mõõnnâd : mõʹnne : mõõn

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg m:0** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg,
oolmaž+N+Sg+Nom: **person/henkilö**
* *o%^1VOWlmm%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>až*
* *oolm000%>až*
* *sää0mm%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *sääʹm000*
kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3 **bow**
* *kååʹmmerd%^PenVow2a*
* *kååʹmmard0*
mainstummuš+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: **story telling/tarinointi**
* ★*mainstummu%^1VOWš%{XC%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^V2VV%^K2GG* (is not standard language)
* ★*mainstummuužž0000* (is not standard language)

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for b** - used
neiʹbb+N+Sg+Gen: **knife/veitsi**
* *nẹ%^1VOWi0bb%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *neeiʹb0000*
vuäʹbb+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2
* *vuä%{ʹØ%}bˈb%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^Allegro%^PAL%^CCC2CAllegro%>stad*
* *vuẹʹb0000000%>stad*
äʹrbb+N+Sg+Gen: **heritage/perintö**
* *ä%^1VOW0rbb%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY*
* *ääʹrb0000*
joorbâs+A+Sg+Nom
* *jo%^1VOWrbbâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY*
* *joorb0âs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss p:0** - used in
* *ǩiâpp%^CC2C*
* *ǩiâv00*
* *vuäʹppest%^Pen%^CC2CAllegro%^RmVow%>ed*
* *vuäʹp00st000%>ed*
* *ka%^1VOWmppâr%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY*
* *kaamp0âr0000*
* ★*ka%^1VOWmppâr%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY* (is not standard language)
* ★*kaamppâr0000* (is not standard language)

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg v:0** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, teevvad > teev
* *pẹ%^1VOWi0vv%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *peeiʹv0000*
tuõvâs+N+Sg+Nom: **candle/tuohus, kynttilä**
* *tuõvˈvâs%^Pen%^CCC2C*
* *tuõv00âs00*
juʹvjj+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:
* *ju%^1VOWv0jj%^VV2V%^PAL%^XYY2VY%>stes*
* *ju0uʹj0000%>stes*

**f:0** - used in

kaaʹff+N+Sg+Gen **coffee**
* *kaa0ff%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *kaaʹf000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg n:0** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, jiõnn:jiõn
vueʹn+N+Sg+Nom: **mother-in-law/anoppi**
* *vuâ0nˈn%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2C*
* *vueʹn00000*
jeäʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: **mother/äiti**
* *jeä0%{ʹØ%}nˈn%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CAllegro%>stan*
* *jiẹˈʹn00000%>stan*

**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel ij>ii/uv>uu and dd>d** - used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen, sijdd > siid

* *ä%^1VOWldd%^V2VV%^XYY2XY*
* *ääld000*
* *ä%^1VOWldd%^V2VV%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY%>už*
* *aald0000%>už*
* *u%^1VOWv0dd%^PAL%^XYY2VY*
* *u0uʹd000*
juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 **think**
* *ju%^1VOWrdd%^V2VV%^VOWLower%^XYY2XY%>am*
* *joord0000%>am*

uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+4:
* *u%^1VOWv0dd%^PAL%^XYY2VY%>et*
* *u0uʹd000%>et*

- idd:id, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg double consonants following vowel and "i" at coda that become single consonants in gradation

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for ʒ** - used with  pääʹʒʒelm+N+Sg+Ill: päʹʒlma
sauʒʒ+N+Pl+Nom **sheep/lammas**
* *sa%^1VOWuʒʒ%^V2VV%^XYY2XY*
* *saauʒ000*

**ǯ:0** - used in
kuʹvǯǯ+N+Sg+Gen
* *ku%^1VOWv0ǯǯ%^PAL%^XYY2VY*
* *ku0uʹǯ000*

**č:0** - used in

**c:0** - used in

**ž:0** - used in

väžsted+V+Inf
* *vääžžast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *vä0ž00st000000>ed*

**z:0** - used in
* *ǩeâsttez%^PenVow2a%^RmCns*
* *ǩeâstta000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for đ** - used with  ǩiđđ:ǩiiđ
* *ǩi%^1VOWđđ%^V2VV%^CC2C*
* *ǩiiđ000*
* *o%^1VOWđđâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C*
* *oođ0âs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for r** - used with  võrr:võõr
* *võ%^1VOWrr%^V2VV%^CC2C*
* *võõr000*
* *paarr%^CC2C*
* *paar00*
* *jä%^1VOWu0rr%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *jääuʹr0000*
čårsted+V+Inf: **descriminate/syrjiä**
* *čåårrast%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>ed*
* *čå0r00st00000%>ed*
* ★*čåårrast%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>ed* (is not standard language)
* ★*čå0rr0st00000%>ed* (is not standard language)

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for l** - used with  vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen: vuuʹl
deriving
* *to%^1VOWll%^V2VV%^CC2C*
* *tool000*
* *stä%^1VOW0llj%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *stääʹl0j000*
alttõõlli+N+NomAg+Pl+Gen
* *alttõõll{ʼØ}i%^CC2C*
* *alttõõl00i0*

pääʹljes+N+Sg+Nom: **path/polku**
* *pä%^1VOW0lljes%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CC2C*
* *pääʹl0jes000000*
talsted+V+Inf:
* *taallâst%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>ed*
* *ta0l00st00000%>ed*

vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen:
* *vu%^1VOWv0ll%^PAL%^XYY2VY*
* *vu0uʹl000*

deriving kueʹll+N+Sg+Gen: kueʹl
* *kuâ0ll%^V2VV%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *kueʹl00000*

**j:0 ** - used in

ǩeʹrjj+N+Pl+Nom: **book/kirja**
* *ǩẹ%^1VOW0rjj%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY*
* *ǩeeʹrj0000*
tuâjj+N+Sg+Acc: **work/työ**
* *tuâjj%^CC2C*
* *tuâj00*
tuâjj+N+Sg+Gen:tuâi
* *tuâjj%^J2I%^CC2C*
* *tuâi000*
* *po%^1VOWjjâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C*
* *pooj0âs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for g** - used in
cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Ill
* *cõõggâlm%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>a*
* *cõ0g00lm00000%>a*
* *ǩeâlggal%^Pen%^XYY2XY*
* *ǩeâlǥ0al00*

äiʹǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen: **time/aika**
* *ä%^1VOWi0gg%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY*
* *ääiʹj0000*
reäiʹǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom: **hole/reikä**
* *reäi0gg%^PAL%^XYY2XY*
* *reäiʹj000*

GEMINATE TO WEAK QUALITY GEMINATE
**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and KK>ǤǤ**  - used in
used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen for cases like
lookki > looǥǥi.

čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
* *čâustõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}k%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG*
* *čâustõõ0ǥǥ00*
with allegro
čâustõk+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3
* *čâustõ%{ʹØ%}k%^K2GAllegro%>stes*
* *čâustõ0ǥ0%>stes*

* *jo%^1VOWkk%^V2VV%^KK2GG*
* *jooǥǥ00*
čuâǥǥas+N+Sg+Nom  **road**
* *čuâkˈk%^KKK2GG%>as*
* *čuâǥ0ǥ0%>as*

loǥškueʹtted **begin to read**
* *loo%{ʹØ%}kk%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škueʹtted*
* *lo00ǥ000»škueʹtted*

čõõǥǥâs
* *čõ%^1VOWkkâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^KK2GG*
* *čõõǥǥâs0000*

**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and k:j** - used in
used with
> .
tuʹmstõk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: **decision/päätös, mietintö**
* *tuʹmstõ%^1VOW0k%{XC%}%^V2VV%^PAL%^K2GG%>e*
* *tuʹmstõõʹjj000%>e*

with allegro

* *suä0kk%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG*
* *suẹʹjj000*

* *jeä0kˈkel%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2GG%^RmVow%>až*
* *jeeʹj0j0l0000000%>až*

**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and ǩ:j** - used in
used with
> .

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing š:ž** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen
* *lookkmõ%^1VOWš%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG*
* *lookkmõõžž00*
with allegro

* *pååss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

mainstummuš+N+Sg+Gen:
* *mainstummuš%^VC*
* *mainstummuž0*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing c:ʒ** - cc:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
* *čää0cc%^PAL%^KK2GG*
* *čääʹʒʒ00*
čääʹcc+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
* *čää0cc%^VV2V%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro%>stes*
* *čä0ʹʒ0000%>stes*
* *čää0cc%^PAL%^KK2GG%>stes*
* *čääʹʒʒ00%>stes*
* *puõcˈc%^VOWLower%^PALÄ%^KKK2GG*
* *puäʒ0ʒ000*
* *pååss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

õõʒʒâs+N+Sg+Nom: **high water/vuoksi**
* *õ%^1VOWccâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^KK2GG*
* *õõʒʒâs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing č:j** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation

* *pååss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing after long vowel or diphthong s:z s:z** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
tääʹss+N+Sg+Gen: **level/taso**
* *tää0ss%^PAL%^KK2GG*
* *tääʹzz00*
* *mättʼtõ%^1VOWs%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG*
* *mättʼtõõzz00*
with allegro

cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: **trick, type of ear mark/tikki, pykälä**
* ★*ciâkˈkes%^Pen%^VOWLower%^PenVow2a%^VC* (is not standard language)
* ★*ceäkˈkas0000* (is not standard language)
* *pååss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

čårrõs+N+Sg+Gen
* *čårrõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}s%{XC%}%^V2VV%^K2GG*
* *čårrõõ0zz00*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss t:0** - used in
autt+N+Pl+Nom **car/auto**
* *a%^1VOWutt%^V2VV%^CC2C*
* *aaut000*
põrtt+N+Pl+Nom **house/talo**
* *põ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rtt%^V2VV%^XYY2XY*
* *põõ0rt000*

* *ko%^1VOWnttâr%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY*
* *koont0âr0000*
piiutâs+N+Sg+Nom **clothing/vaate**
* *pi%^1VOWhttâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2VY*
* *piiut0âs0000*
kääđas+N+Sg+Nom
* *kä^1VOWttas^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *kääđ0as0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, third consonant loss** - lgg:lǥ, Vow Ca Cx Cx:0, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants following consonant at coda that become single consonants in gradation

šapšš+N+Sg+Gen **white fish/siika**
* *ša%^1VOWpšš%^V2VV%^XYY2XY*
* *šaapš000*

**Consonant loss s:0** - used in

* *sä%^1VOWhss%^V2VV%^XYY2VY%>am*
* *sääus000%>am*

uhss+N+Sg+Gen **door**
* *uhss%^XYY2VY*
* *uus00*

ǩeäsʼsted+V+Inf:
* *ǩeä%{ˈ1%}ssast^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *ǩeäˈs00st0000>ed*
âʹpsted+V+Inf: **smell a little/haiskahtaa**
* *ââʹpsest%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow*
* *â0ʹp00st000*

**Consonant loss ŋ:0** - used in

**Consonant loss h:0** - used in
ruʹhss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:
* *ru%^1VOW0hss%^VV2V%^PAL%^XYY2VY%>stes*
* *ru0ʹ0s0000%>stes*

**Even syllabic verbs I, t>đ** - tt:đ
ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1 **hand,arm/käsi**
* *ǩiõ0tt%^Allegro%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%>stan*
* *ǩiõʹđ0000%>stan*
autt+N+Pl+Nom **car/auto**
* ★*a%^1VOWutt%^V2VV%^CC2C* (is not standard language)
* ★*aauđ000* (is not standard language)
puuttâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **end/loppua**
* *puutt%^CC2C%>i*
* *puuđ00%>i*
kääđas+N+Sg+Nom:
kä%^1VOWttas%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^CC2C
kääđ0as0000

**Even syllabic nouns I, p>v** - pp:v
* *ǩiâpp%^CC2C*
* *ǩiâv00*
* *heäpˈpaš%^Pen%^CCC2C*
* *heäv00aš00*

**Consonant quality change ǥ:j** - used in
* *lääi0ǥ%^PAL*
* *lääiʹj0*
čiõʹlj+N+Sg+Nom: **back/selkä**
* *čeâ%{ʹØ%}lǥ%^VOWRaise%^PAL*
* *čiõʹlj00*

* *jäämalǥ%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%^PALK%>ed*
* *jä0m0lj0000%>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss k:0** - used in
loǥškueʹtted **begin to read**
* *lookk%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škueʹtted*
* *lo0ǥ000»škueʹtted*
mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: **milk/maito**
* *meâ0lkk%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C*
* *mieʹlǩ00000*
* *pååss%^VV2V%^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*
taalkâs+N+Sg+Nom
* *ta%^1VOWlkkâs%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^XYY2XY*
* *taalk0âs0000*

* *jeä0kˈkel%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2ZERO*
* *jeeʹ000el000000*
nââʹer+N+Sg+Nom sleep
* *nâ%^1VOW0kker%^Pen%^V2VV%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KK2ZERO*
* *nââʹ00er000000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss ǩ:0** - used in

eʹǩrded+V+Inf
* *eeʹǩǩerd%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>ed*
* *e0ʹǩ00rd00000%>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss ǥ:0** - used in

påǥsted+V+Inf
* *pååǥǥast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *på0ǥ00st00000>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, lgg>lǥ**
vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
* *vuâ{ʹØ}lgg^XYY2XY>ak*
* *vuâ0lǥ00>ak*

* ★*vuâ{ʹØ}lgg^XYY2XY>ak* (is not standard language)
* ★*vuâ0lg00>ak* (is not standard language)
õlggâd+V+Cond+Sg3
* *õ^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^XYY2XY>či*
* *õõ0lǥ000>či*
* ★*õ^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^XYY2XY>či* (is not standard language)
* ★*õõ0lg000>či* (is not standard language)

* *ǩeâlggal^Pen^XYY2XY*
* *ǩeâlǥ0al00*
* *aaggâst^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *a0g00st00000>ed*

**even syllabic verbs I, 'lgg>'lj** - used in
vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
* *vuâ0lgg^VOWRaise^PAL^XYY2XY>im*
* *vuõʹlj0000>im*
* *ä^1VOWi0gg^V2VV^PAL^XYY2XY*
* *ääiʹj0000*
reäiʹǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom
* *reäi0gg^PAL^XYY2XY*
* *reäiʹj000*
